parSem/xip/archive/simple.4/esperanto/GRAMMARS/ENGLISH/FST/src/lex-locthales.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# CONTENT:	 (template file for place names)
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:	 ENGLISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:	 A. Schiller
!#
!# CREATED:	 26-Oct-2006
!# ============================================================================
!# USAGE:	 xfst  -e "read lexc [ThisFile]" -l rules.xfst
!# ============================================================================
!#
!# SOURCES: 	(add as appropriate)
!#
!# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop		! proper name			(e.g. "America", "Denmark")
+Noun		! demonym noun 			(e.g. "Dane")	
+Adj		! demonym adjective		(e.g. "Danish")
+NAdj		! demonym noun or adjective	(e.g. "American")

+PostMod	! post-modifier [not used]
+PreMod		! pre-modifier	(e.g. "East")
+Head		! head word  	(e.g. "County")

+Continent	!
+Country	! country/nation of the world
+UsaState	! state of the USA
+State		! state/province of other country
+County		! county of GB
+Region		! other region (not further classified)
+City+Place		!
+River
+Loc		! location (in general)

+Place		! unclassified place name (from original analyser)


+Abbr		! abbreviation
+Acron		! acronym

+Sg		! singular
+Pl		! plural
+SP		! singular and plural
+Gen		! genitive/possessive 's

! for internal use:
^MAN		! for irregular plura -man -> -men
^AND		! " and " or "&"
^DOT		! optional period at end of abbreviation
^PlE		! plural ending with -e-


! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! tag combinations:
! PLACE =  	[ +City+Place | +Continent | +Country | +Conty | +Loc 
!		| +Region | +River | +State | +UsaState ] ;
! --------
! [+] NOTE: PLACE* indicates that several place tags may appear together:
!		e.g. 	"Washington+Prop+City+Place+UsaState+Sg"
!			"Valencia+Prop+City+Place+Region+Sg"
!			"Valencian+NAdj+City+Place+Region+Sg"
! --------
!
!	+Prop PLACE* 		[+Sg|+Pl] (+Gen) (+Acron|+Abbr)
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# NOTE: white space ( ) and literal zeros (0) must be escaped by a precent sign %

LEXICON GENSG		< %^GenSg >		#;
LEXICON GENPL		< %^GenPl >		#;

LEXICON optGENSG	#; GENSG;
LEXICON optGENPL	#; GENPL;

LEXICON N/SG		< %+Sg:0 >		optGENSG;
LEXICON N/PL		< %+Pl:0 >		optGENPL;
LEXICON N/SG+PLs				N/SG; 
			< 0:{+s} >		N/PL;

LEXICON PROP/SG		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG;
LEXICON PROP/PL		< %+Prop:0 >		N/PL;
LEXICON PROP		< %+Prop:0 >		N/SG+PLs;

LEXICON ROOT
Arab% Republic% of% Egypt+Country		PROP/SG;	!# multi-word country name, singular only
Zwolle+Place					PROP/SG;	!# place name (not further classified)
Alps+Region                                     PROP/PL;  	!# region name, plural only
Heard% Island+Country                           PROP;  		!# country name, singular and plural possible
Abdanan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Abyek+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Agha% Jari+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ajabshir+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Akbarabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Alashtar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Aliabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Aligudarz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Alvand+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Amir% Kala+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Aq% Qaleh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ardistan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ashtian+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Astaneh-ye% Ashrafiyeh+City+Place		PROP/SG;
Azad% Shahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Azar% Shahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Azna+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Babol% Sar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bafq+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Baft+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bahar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Abbas+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Anzali+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Emam% Khomeyni+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Gonaveh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Lengeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Mahshahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Torkaman+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bardsir+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bojnurd+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Borujan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Borujerd+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bukan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Chalus+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Chenaran+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Damavand+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Darab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Dargaz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Darrehshahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Dashti+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Deh% Dasht+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Dehloran+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Delijan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Dezful+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Do% Gonbadan+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Do% Rud+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Eqlid+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Eslamabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Estehban+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ezeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Faridan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Fariman+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Farrokhshahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Farsan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Fawman+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ferdus+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Fereydun% Kenar+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Fereydunshahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Firuzabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Fuladshahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Garmi+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Garmsar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Gerash+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Gilan-e% Ġarb+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Golpayegan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Gonbad-e% Qabus+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Hadishahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Hamadan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Harsin+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Hashtgerd+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Hashtrud+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Hendijan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Iranshahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Jask+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Javanrud+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Juybar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kahnuj+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kalaleh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kamyaran+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kazerun+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kehgiluyeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khash+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khomeyn+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khonsar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khormuj+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khorramdarreh+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Kongan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kordkuy+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kuhdasht+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Langarud+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Mahallat+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Mahmudabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Malekan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Marv% Dasht+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Masjed-e% Soleyman+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Mehriz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Minab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Minudasht+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Naqadeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nazarabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Neka+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Neyriz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Neyshabur+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nurabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nushahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Omidiyeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Orumiyeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Oshnaviyeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Paveh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qaemiyeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qaemshahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qanat+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qarahziyaeddin+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Qeshm+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Quchan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ramhormoz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ramshir+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ravar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Rudbar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Rudsar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Şahneh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sarband+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sar-e-Pol-e-Zohab+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Savadkuh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Şawmaeh% Sara+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Semirom+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sepidan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shadegan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shahindezh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shahr-e% Babak+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Shahr-e% Kord+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Shahreza+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shahrud+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shush+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shushtar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sonqor+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Susangerd+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ţabas+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Takestan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Talesh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Tangestan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Taybad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Tonekabon+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Torbat-e% Heydariyeh+City+Place		PROP/SG;
Torbat-e% Jam+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Tuysarkan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Yasuj+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Abadeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Abhar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ahar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ahvaz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Amol+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Andimeshk+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Arak+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ardabil+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ardakan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Asadabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Astara+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Babol+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Baneh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Behbahan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Behshahr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bijar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Birjand+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bonab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Borazjan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Bushehr+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Chabahar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Damghan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Esfarayen+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Fasa+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Gonabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Gorgan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ilam+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Isfahan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Jahrom+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Jiroft+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kangavar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kashan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kashmar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Kermanshah+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khalkhal+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Khorramabad+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Khorramshahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Khoy+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Lahijan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Lar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Mahabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Maku+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Malayer+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Maragheh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Marand+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Marivan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Mehran+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Meshkinshahr+City+Place			PROP/SG;
Meybod+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Miandoab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Mianeh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nahavand+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nain+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Parsabad+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qaen+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Qorveh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Ramsar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sabzevar+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sanandaj+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sarab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Saravan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Saveh+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Shiraz+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Sirjan+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Takab+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Zabol+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Marghera+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Novovoronezh+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Chelyabinsk+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Krasnoyarsk+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Balakovo+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Zheleznogorsk+City+Place	 		PROP/SG;
Ordzhonikidze+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Turboatom+Bus					PROP/SG;
Kazd+Place 				PROP/SG;
Elburz+Region+Place		 		PROP/SG;
Rudan+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Bandar-e% Langeh+City+Place	 		PROP/SG;
Saghand+Place		 			PROP/SG;
Mazandaran+Region+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Ashgabat+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Akhvaz+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Tabas+City+Place	 			PROP/SG;
Semipalatinsk+City+Place 			PROP/SG;
Faisalabad+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Zarnowiec+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Hanau+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Dimona+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Larnaka+City+Place 				PROP/SG;
Pelindaba+Place 				PROP/SG;
Osirak						PROP/SG;
Dir+City+Place				PROP/SG;
Nur+City+Place				PROP/SG;
